District of Columbia statutes.
2-1831.14

Representation of parties in adjudicated cases before the Office.

(a)

An individual may represent himself or herself before the Office.

(b)

An individual or other party may be represented before the Office by an attorney authorized to practice law in the District of Columbia, or may be assisted by others in such a manner and under such circumstances as are permitted by law, or as may be permitted under the rules of the Office.

(c)

A corporation, partnership, limited partnership, or other private legal entity may be represented before the Office by a duly authorized officer, director, general partner, or employee.

(d)

An agency may be represented before the Office by the Corporation Counsel, an attorney assigned to the agency, or by a duly authorized agency employee when consistent with applicable law and rules.

(e)

The Office shall promulgate rules regulating attorneys practicing before the Office.

History

Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-76, § 17, 48 DCR 11442